Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1082YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 100 Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11E. U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates. 3 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 4 director may issue U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates to the owner of a 5 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 6 subsection 1, autocycle, motor truck, motor home, multipurpose 7 vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer. 8 b. The department shall request and receive designs for the 9 U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates from members of the public. The 10 department shall allow members of the public to choose the 11 final design for the U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates by holding a 12 vote on the departmentâs internet site. 13 c. The special U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) fee for letter-number 14 designated U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates is thirty-five dollars. 15 An applicant may obtain personalized U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates 16 upon payment of the fee for personalized plates as provided in 17 subsection 5, which is in addition to the special U.S.S. Iowa 18 (BB-61) fee. Personalized plates authorized by this subsection 19 may be limited to no more than five numerals, letters, or 20 combinations of numerals and letters if the department 21 determines limiting the number of numerals and letters is 22 necessary due to the final design of the plates. 23 d. The fees collected by the director under this subsection 24 shall be paid monthly to the treasurer of state and deposited 25 in the road use tax fund. The treasurer of state shall 26 transfer monthly from the statutory allocations fund created 27 under section 321.145, subsection 2, to the general fund of 28 the state the amount of the special fees collected in the 29 previous month for U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates. Such moneys 30 are appropriated to the department of veterans affairs to 31 distribute in the form of grants to organizations that maintain 32 or fundraise for the maintenance of the U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61). 33 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this 34 subsection shall not revert. 35 -1- LSB 1082YH (3) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 100 e. Upon receipt of the special registration plates, the 1 applicant shall surrender the current registration plates to 2 the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall validate 3 the special registration plates in the same manner as regular 4 registration plates are validated under this section. The 5 annual special U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) fee for letter-number 6 designated plates is ten dollars which shall be paid in 7 addition to the regular annual registration fee. The annual 8 fee for personalized U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates is five dollars 9 which shall be paid in addition to the annual special U.S.S. 10 Iowa (BB-61) fee and the regular annual registration fee. The 11 annual special U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) fee shall be credited as 12 provided under paragraph âdâ . 13 f. The department shall not condition the issuance of U.S.S. 14 Iowa (BB-61) plates on the receipt of any number of orders for 15 U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) plates. 16 g. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 17 to administer this subsection. 18 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT TO SUBMIT LEGISLATION. If the final 19 design for U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) special registration plates, 20 as provided in this Act, does not comply with section 21 321.166, subsection 2 or 9, or any other provision of law, 22 the department of transportation shall submit legislation for 23 consideration by the general assembly to make any necessary 24 changes. 25